South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S699.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-1538(I) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (I) For purposes of this section: (1) "Authorized emergency vehicle" means any ambulance, police, fire, rescue, recovery, or towing vehicle authorized by this State, county, or municipality to respond to a traffic incidentan emergency scene. (2) "Emergency services personnel" means fire, police, or emergency medical services personnel (EMS) responding to an emergency incidentscene. SECTION 2.  Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-1539. When an authorized law enforcement vehicle is parked or standing within five feet of a roadway, conducting a traffic related stop or investigation, and giving a warning signal by appropriate light, the driver of every other approaching vehicle shall, as soon as it is safe and when not otherwise directed by an individual lawfully directing traffic: (A) move the vehicle into a lane that is not the lane nearest to the parked or standing authorized law enforcement vehicle and continue traveling in that lane until safely clear of the authorized law enforcement vehicle. This only applies if the roadway has at least two lanes for traffic proceeding in the direction of the approaching vehicle and if the approaching vehicle may change lanes safely without interfering with any other vehicular traffic; or (B) slow the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for traffic conditions, and operate the vehicle at a reduced speed and be prepared to stop until completely past the authorized law enforcement vehicle. This only applies if the roadway has only one lane for traffic proceeding in the direction of the approaching vehicle or if the approaching vehicle may not change lanes safely and without interfering with any other vehicular traffic. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----